Louisiana, session 2026, HB901.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:4(B)(1)(m) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Structure of executive branch of state government
* * *
B. The office of the governor shall be in the executive branch of state
government. The governor may allocate within his office the powers, duties, funds,
functions, appropriations, responsibilities, and personnel of the agencies within his
office and provide for the administration thereof and for the organization of his
office. The following agencies and their powers, duties, functions, and
responsibilities are hereby transferred to the office of the governor:
(1) Division of administration (including but not limited to Subtitle I of Title
39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 generally). The following agencies are
placed within the division of administration:
* * *
(m) The Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank (R.S. 48:81 et seq.). The
division shall perform and exercise its powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities
in the manner provided for by law.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 48:77.3 and Subpart B of Part V of Chapter 1 of Title 48 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, to be comprised of R.S. 48:81 through 90.2 are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§77.3 Transportation Trust Fund; dedication and uses of certain monies to the
Louisiana State Infrastructure Fund
A. Federal funds, to the extent authorized and awarded under federal law,
that are made available to the state under the Federal Highway Trust Fund, or any
successor federal transportation trust fund, for the purpose of capitalizing a state
infrastructure bank or providing credit assistance, and subject to all applicable
Page 2 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
federal requirements, may be deposited into the Louisiana State Infrastructure Fund
pursuant to R.S. 48:86.
SUBPART B. LOUISIANA STATE INFRASTRUCTURE BANK
§81. Definitions
For purposes of this Subpart, the following terms have the meaning ascribed
to them as follows:
(1) "Bank" means the Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank.
(2) "Board" means the board of directors of the bank.
(3) "Division" means the division of administration
(4) "Eligible costs" means the following:
(a) For an eligible infrastructure project to be financed from a federal
account, the costs permitted under applicable federal laws, requirements, procedures,
and guidelines governing the relevant federal funds or credit programs.
(b) For an eligible infrastructure project financed from a state or local
account, the costs of preliminary engineering, planning, environmental studies,
permitting, right-of-way or property acquisition, legal and financial services, design,
construction, construction management, equipment, facilities, resilience upgrades,
and other costs necessary for the eligible infrastructure projects.
(5) "Eligible infrastructure project" means any infrastructure facility
approved by the applicable technical agency pursuant to R.S. 48:87 and selected by
the bank to receive a loan or other financial assistance to defray an eligible cost,
including but not limited to:
(a) Transportation related projects, including public roads, highways,
bridges, ports, airports, ferries, transit, rail, intermodal, and safety improvements.
(b) Water related projects, including drinking water, wastewater, storm
water, drainage, levees, flood mitigation, and coastal protection.
(c) Energy related projects, including grid modernization, transmission and
distribution resilience, public energy infrastructure, and eligible clean energy and
efficiency infrastructure serving public purposes.
Page 3 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
(d) Resilience and hazard mitigation related projects, including infrastructure
upgrades that reduce disaster risk, improve recovery, and protect critical services.
(e) Other public infrastructure categories as authorized by law and adopted
by board rule, including projects that enhance economic development, public safety,
and quality of life.
(6) "Financing agreement" means any agreement entered into between the
bank and a qualified borrower pertaining to a loan or other financial assistance,
including without limitation a loan agreement, trust indenture, security agreement,
reimbursement agreement, guarantee agreement, bond or note, ordinance or
resolution, or similar instrument.
(7) "Governmental unit" means a parish, municipality, political subdivision,
special district, authority, public board, commission, publicly operated port, harbor,
terminal district, airport, ferry, transit system, or other public entity as authorized by
law.
(8) "Qualified borrower" means:
(a) Any governmental unit authorized by the board to construct, operate, or
own an eligible infrastructure project.
(b) Any private entity, including a concessionaire or special purpose entity,
participating in a public infrastructure project pursuant to a public-private
partnership, concession, design-build-finance, or similar delivery method, to the
extent permitted by applicable federal law and state law, provided that the board
determines that the assistance is for a public purpose and is adequately secured
pursuant to R.S. 48:88.
(9) "Loan" means an obligation subject to repayment provided by the bank
to a qualified borrower for all or part of the eligible costs of an eligible infrastructure
project and may be disbursed in anticipation of reimbursement or as direct payment.
(10) "Other financial assistance" means, but is not limited to credit
enhancement; capital or debt reserves; interest rate subsidies; letters of credit; loan
guarantees; subordinate or contingent loans; bond or other debt security; purchase
Page 4 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
of loan obligations; revolving lines of credit; and other lawful forms of financing and
methods of leveraging funds approved by the board, and, in the case of federal funds,
as allowed by federal law or regulation.
(11) "Project revenues" means all rates, rents, fees, assessments, charges,
grants, appropriations, availability payments, pledged taxes, dedicated revenues, user
charges, resilience or insurance-related proceeds, and other receipts derived or to be
derived from an eligible infrastructure project or made available from a special
source, including revenues of any system of which the project is a part, as provided
in an applicable financing agreement.
§82. Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank; legislative findings; creation; purposes
A. The legislature finds the following:
(1) There is a critical need to increase investment in the development and
maintenance of Louisiana's physical infrastructure, including facilities related to
transportation, water, energy, resilience, and hazard mitigation in order to grow the
economy and sustain the state's vital infrastructure.
(2) While grant funding remains an important tool for infrastructure
investment, increasing project costs and expanding federal credit opportunities
require complementary financing mechanisms. A revolving loan program allows the
state to maximize available resources, protect taxpayers, and reinvest repayments
into future infrastructure needs.
B. There is hereby created within the division of administration the
"Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank", hereinafter referred to as the "bank", which
shall be allocated to the division of administration as an agency of the state.
C. The purpose of the bank is to select and assist in financing eligible
infrastructure projects by providing loans and other financial assistance to qualified
borrowers for planning, constructing, improving, rehabilitating, and making resilient
infrastructure facilities necessary for public purposes.
D. Any loan or other financial assistance provided pursuant to this Subpart
shall be made pursuant to a cooperative endeavor agreement between the bank and
Page 5 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
a qualified borrower. Any such cooperative endeavor agreement shall meet the
following requirements:
(1) The loan or other financial assistance shall be for a public purpose that
comports with the governmental purpose that the bank and the qualified borrower
have the legal authority to pursue and the loan or other financial assistance comports
with the requirement of this Subpart.
(2) The loan or other financial assistance is not gratuitous.
(3) The bank has a demonstrable, objective, and reasonable expectation of
receiving at minimum the equivalent value in exchange for the loan or other financial
assistance.
E. The bank is established as a revolving loan and credit assistance program
that administers both federal and state funds in accordance with applicable federal
and state laws and regulations, except where required by applicable federal law, the
bank shall not provide grants. All assistance shall be structured to ensure repayment
and the continued revolving use of funds. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed
to supersede or diminish the authority of any state agency to administer its existing
infrastructure programs.
§83. Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank; board of directors
A. The bank shall be governed, administered, and operated by a board of
directors composed of the following members:
(1) The commissioner of administration or his designee.
(2) The chair of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget or his
designee.
(3) The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development or
his designee.
(4) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality or
his designee.
(5) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Conservation and Energy
or his designee.
Page 6 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
(6) The secretary of the Louisiana Economic Development or his designee.
(7) One member appointed by a majority of the other members from among
three persons nominated by the Louisiana Bankers Association with not less than
five years of experience in commercial lending or investment banking.
(8) One member appointed by the State Board of Certified Public
Accountants of Louisiana with no less than five years of experience in accounting
and auditing standards.
B. Appointed members shall serve a term of three years. All vacancies shall
be filled in the same manner as provided in the original appointment.
C.(1) The board shall adopt bylaws and conduct meetings in accordance with
the Open Meetings Law.
(2) The commissioner of administration or his designee shall serve as chair
of the board.
D. The board shall be staffed by the division of administration, which may
enter interagency agreements with the Louisiana Department of Transportation and
Development, Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality, Louisiana
Department of Conservation and Energy, and Louisiana Economic Development for
technical review, underwriting support, and program coordination.
E. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to supersede or diminish the
authority of any state agency to administer existing infrastructure program.
§84. Board of directors; powers and duties
A. In addition to the powers contained in this Subpart, the board shall have
all powers necessary, useful, or appropriate to operate the bank and finance eligible
infrastructure projects, including but not limited to:
(1) Perpetual succession.
(2) Ability to pursue any necessary legal action upon written approval of the
attorney general and to be sued in the name of the bank.
(3) Adopt an official seal.
Page 7 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
(4) Grant loans, acquire and sell loan obligations, and provide other financial
assistance pursuant to cooperative endeavor agreements.
(5) Enter contracts and execute financing agreements and related
instruments.
(6) Establish program rules and underwriting standards pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, including risk management policies, portfolio
concentration limits, and procedures for default and remedies. The procedures
include underwriting standards, portfolio concentration limits, credit risk
management policies, stress testing, and loss-reserve requirements.
(7) Establish fiscal controls and accounting procedures.
(8) Enter agreements with any agency or instrumentality of the United
States, the state of Louisiana, or another state to finance eligible infrastructure
projects.
(9) Procure insurance, guarantees, letters of credit, and other credit support.
(10) Borrow money and issue bonds, notes, or other evidence of
indebtedness as provided by this Subpart.
(11) Collect fees and charges in connection with loans or other assistance.
(12) Accept and hold funds deposited with the bank the federal government,
by the state, governmental units, or private entities, with or without payment of
interest, as allowed by law.
(13) Establish advisory committees, including a technical review committee
comprised of representatives from the Louisiana Department of Transportation and
Development, Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality, Louisiana
Department of Conservation and Energy, and Louisiana Economic Development, to
provide nonbinding recommendations on project eligibility, permitting readiness,
economic development alignment, resilience benefits, and environmental
compliance.
Page 8 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
(14) Retain financial advisors, legal counsel, investment advisors, credit
analysts, servicers, and other professional services necessary to carry out the
purposes of the bank.
(15) Implement the bank in phases, including initial capitalization or lending
limits, and shall report to the legislature on program performance prior to expansion.
(16) Enter into agreements and take all actions necessary or convenient to
receive, administer, and comply with the requirements of any federal program
providing grants, loans, or other credit assistance of the bank or the fund, including
execution of assurances, certifications, and compliance instruments required under
applicable federal law.
(17) Retain and compensate legal counsel, including the attorney general,
bond counsel, and other specialized legal advisors, as necessary to provide legal
guidance on the development, implementation, and administration of the bank and
its financing programs, subject to applicable procurement laws.
B. Following the close of each fiscal year, the board shall submit an annual
report to the governor and the legislature no later than September first, including a
summary of capitalization, portfolio performance, defaults, leverage, and project
outcomes. The board shall also submit an annual report to any appropriate federal
agency in accordance with the requirements of any federal program. The annual
report shall include recommendations for statutory or programmatic changes as
warranted by experience.
C. The board shall obtain an independent annual financial audit of the bank.
§85. Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank; authority; powers
A. The bank shall not be authorized or empowered to be or to constitute a
bank or trust company within the jurisdiction or control of the state of Louisiana, or
any agency of the state, the Office of Comptroller of the Currency, the United States
Department of the Treasury, a bank, banker, or dealer in securities within the
meaning of, or subject to the provisions of, any securities, securities exchange, or
securities dealers' law of the United States or this state.
Page 9 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
B. All deposits taken by the bank shall contain a notice stating that the
deposits are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
C. The bank may act as a borrower, co-borrower, or conduit borrower with
respect to federal or other credit assistance and may on-lend or otherwise deploy
such proceeds consistent with applicable law.
§86. Louisiana State Infrastructure Fund; creation; sources of monies; accounts
A. There is hereby created, as a special fund in the state treasury, the
Louisiana State Infrastructure Fund, hereinafter referred to as the "fund". The fund
shall be maintained and operated by the board to administer a revolving fund and
provide assistance for eligible infrastructure projects.
B. Monies in the fund shall be used exclusively by the bank to provide
assistance pursuant to cooperative endeavor agreements for eligible infrastructure
projects as permitted by federal law and this Subpart.
C.(1) Monies required for operation of the bank or otherwise dedicated shall
be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law, except as limited by federal law
or grant conditions.
(2) Revenues used to capitalize the fund shall include but are not limited to:
(a) Monies deposited pursuant to R.S. 48:77.
(b) Legislative appropriations.
(c) Grants, contributions, and credit assistance from federal programs,
including transportation, environmental, energy, hazard mitigation, and resilience
programs as allowed by law.
(d) Repayments of principal, interest, fees, and investment earnings.
(e) Proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the bank.
(f) Gifts, donations, philanthropic capital, and program-related investments.
(g) Deposits or investments from governmental units and private entities as
allowed by law.
(h) Any other revenues, whether local, state, or federal, as may be provided
by law.
Page 10 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
(i) Any other lawful source of money that is made available to the bank.
(j) In addition to monies deposited pursuant to R.S. 48:77, the legislature
may capitalize the fund through direct appropriations, capital outlay conversations,
federal funds, repayments, surplus or one-time revenues, or other lawful sources
approved by the State Bond Commission.
D. The bank shall establish and maintain accounts in the fund sufficient to:
(1) Segregate federal funds by program requirements and prohibit
commingling.
(2) Segregate state and local funds by infrastructure sector as necessary to
meet statutory, bond, or program conditions.
(3) Establish reserve accounts, debt service accounts, credit risk accounts,
and other accounts as needed for prudent financial management and leveraging.
E. All unexpended and unencumbered monies shall remain in the fund at
fiscal year end except as required by federal law or grant conditions. All
repayments, fees, interest, and other program income shall remain in the fund and
shall not lapse or revert to the state general fund.
F. The State Bond Commission is subject to the following approvals:
(1) Retain approval authority, as required by existing law, over the issuances
of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the bank.
(2) Retain any guarantee, pledge, or use of the credit, revenues, or taxing
power of the state.
(3) Retain any capitalization action or financing structure that constitutes or
gives rise to state debt or a moral obligation of the state.
G. The State Bond Commission shall be limited to loans and other financial
assistance made by the bank from monies already on deposit in the Louisiana State
Infrastructure Fund pursuant to this Subpart, and issued in accordance with
board-adopted underwriting standards and duly executed financing agreements, shall
not constitute state debt, and shall not be considered an obligation of the state, and
Page 11 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
shall not require separate approval by the State Bond Commission unless otherwise
required by law.
H. The bank is authorized to expend monies of the fund, including loan
repayments, interest, fees, and investment earnings, for the reasonable and necessary
costs of administering and operating the bank. The administrative expenditures shall
be subject to annual approval by the board as part of an operating budget and shall
be made in accordance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations
governing the management and expenditure of public funds.
I. Monies of the fund not immediately required for disbursement may be
invested by the state treasurer in accordance with applicable state law and any
applicable federal requirements, and all interest or investment earnings shall be
credited to the fund.
J. The fund shall be authorized to participate in private capital, subject to the
following limitations:
(1) The fund may receive deposits, investments, or other financial
participation from private entities, including institutional or private equity investors,
for the purpose of supporting eligible infrastructure projects, providing credit
enhancements, establishing reserves, or leveraging public funds, as approved by the
board.
(2) Any such private participation shall not constitute equity in, ownership
of, or any governance or control interest in the bank or the fund, and shall not grant
any voting rights, management authority, or preferential access to projects.
(3) All private capital shall be accepted and administered solely pursuant to
written financing or participation agreements approved by the board, be used
exclusively for public purposes authorized by this Subpart, and be subject to all
applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and oversight requirements.
(4) No private funds shall be commingled with federal funds in a manner
inconsistent with federal law, and no obligation of the bank arising from private
participation shall constitute a debt, pledge, or obligation of the state.
Page 12 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
§87. Applications; eligibility; technical review
A. The board shall determine the form and content of applications and
financing agreements, including interest rates, terms, security, and repayment
sources.
B. Projects eligible for financing by the bank shall be submitted through a
sponsoring state agency with programmatic responsibility for the infrastructure
sector, pursuant to a loan pathway and underwriting framework adopted by the board
for that agency. The board shall retain final authority over all financing decisions
and terms. The board may approve alternative submission procedures by rule where
no appropriate agency pathway exists.
C. Prior to board action, each proposed project shall receive a technical
review by the applicable technical agency or the technical review committee, as
determined by board rule, including:
(1) The Department of Transportation and Development for transportation
eligibility and readiness.
(2) The Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality for environmental
compliance and permitting readiness, and coordination with existing water and
environmental infrastructure programs. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed
to alter, diminish, or expand the authority, responsibilities, or operating procedures
of the Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality or its administration of
existing state or federally authorized water infrastructure programs, including
drinking water and clean water revolving funds. The bank is intended to provide
complementary and supplemental financing, where appropriate and permitted by
law, to support eligible projects without duplicating or replacing existing programs.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Conservation and Energy for energy and
natural resource alignment and resilience considerations.
(4) The Louisiana Economic Development for economic development
alignment and coordination with existing state economic development and site
readiness programs. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to alter, diminish, or
Page 13 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
expand the authority, responsibilities, or operating procedures of Louisiana
Economic Development, including its administration of existing site development,
infrastructure, or economic development financing programs, such as the FastSite
Program. The bank is intended to provide complementary and supplemental
financing, where appropriate and permitted by law, to support eligible projects and
accelerate economic development without duplicating or replacing existing
programs.
D. In selecting projects, the board shall consider feasibility, readiness, public
benefit, risk, repayment ability, resilience benefits, and the level of local or private
participation. The board may provide priority to projects sponsored by rural or
underserved communities or that demonstrate limited access to traditional financing.
E. During the initial implementation phase of the bank, the board may
approve loans with reduced or zero interest rates for a governmental unit that has
materially participated in the establishment, capitalization, or programmatic
development of the bank, provided that such loans are made pursuant to
board-adopted policies, serve a public purpose, and remain subject to full repayment
of principal. Any such consideration shall be limited in duration and scope, shall be
disclosed in the annual report required by R.S. 48:84(B), and shall not constitute a
grant or donation of public funds.
§88. Interest rates; repayment; terms; security; interception; remedies
A. Loans may bear interest at or below market, may be fixed, variable, or
adjustable, and may include subordinate or contingent repayment structures as
determined by the board. The board may modify, restructure, refinance, or otherwise
amend the terms of any loan or financial assistance in order to protect the financial
interests of the fund.
B. Repayment schedules shall be determined by the board, including the
ability to commence repayment based on substantial completion, revenue
commencement, or availability payment start, as provided in the financing
agreement.
Page 14 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
C. The term of a loan shall not exceed thirty years after the date of the first
payment unless otherwise authorized by applicable federal law for federal accounts.
D. The board may require pledges of project revenues, dedicated taxes,
availability payments, credit enhancement, or other security as permitted in any
regulation or statute.
E. If a borrower fails to comply with contract terms or defaults, the board
may:
(1) Pursue legal or equitable remedies.
(2) Request that the state withhold from the borrower and deposit any state
monies into the fund as permitted in any regulation or statute.
(3) Draw on pledge reserves or credit facilities securing the obligation.
F. The legislature finds and declares that the bank is not established for the
purpose of engaging in the business of banking and shall not be deemed to constitute
a bank, financial institution, or trust company under the laws of this state. The bank
is created solely as a public financing entity to provide loans and other credit
assistance for eligible public infrastructure projects, to leverage federal and private
capital, and to support state and local infrastructure investment. The bank shall not
accept deposits from the general public, provide consumer or commercial banking
services, or otherwise compete with private financial institutions.
§89. Borrower authorization; resolutions; notice; contest period
A. Prior to executing a financing agreement, the board shall require
submission of the following:
(1) For governmental units, a resolution authorizing the agreement and
specifying maximum principal, rate, term, and related terms.
(2) For private entities, evidence of authorization and binding commitment
under the applicable public-private partnership agreement, and evidence of the public
sponsor's approval as required by law and board rule.
B. Publication and contest provisions remain as provided in by the laws of
this state, as applicable.
Page 15 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901
§90. Tax exemption; limited obligations; net state tax supported debt
A. Bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness issued or any
infrastructure bank loan or financing assistance granted pursuant to the authority of
this Subpart shall be exempt from all taxation for state, parish, municipal, or other
purposes. Such bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness or infrastructure
bank loans may be used for deposit with any officer, board, municipality, or other
governmental unit in the state, in any case where, by present or future laws, deposit
of security is required for state funds.
B. Such bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness, such guarantees,
and such pledges issued and delivered pursuant to this authority shall constitute
special and limited obligations of the bank and shall not be secured by the full faith
and credit of the state or any source of revenue of the state other than those sums on
deposit in, credited to, or to be received by the bank, including payments to be made
pursuant to letters of credit.
C. In no event shall any bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, or
guarantee, pledge, or other obligation of any type whatsoever entered into by the
bank be used in the calculation of net state tax supported debt as provided by Article
VII, Section 6(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
§90.1. Public purpose limitation
Funds expended pursuant to this Subpart shall be exclusively used for public
purposes to fund eligible infrastructure projects within the state.
§90.2. Initial capitalization of the Louisiana State Infrastructure Fund
There is hereby appropriated from the state general fund to the Louisiana
State Infrastructure Fund created by this Act, the sum of one hundred million dollars
for providing loans to qualified borrowers for eligible infrastructure projects.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
Page 16 of 24
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 901